Washington statutes.
RCW 32.32.010

Chapter exclusive—Prohibition on conversion without approval—Waiver of requirements.

This chapter shall exclusively govern the conversion of mutual savings banks to capital stock savings banks. No mutual savings bank may convert to the capital stock form of organization without the prior written approval of the director pursuant to this chapter, except that the director may waive requirements of this chapter in appropriate cases.

[ 1994 c 92 s 349; 1981 c 85 s 1.]